fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-miskîsik_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miskîsikw - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, eye	AEW V-initial NDI3

     miskîsik+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: miskîsik
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: niskîsik
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kiskîsik
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: niskîsikonân
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kiskîsikonaw
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kiskîsikowâw
     
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: oskîsik
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: oskîsikowâw
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: oskîsikoyiw

     miskîsik+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: miskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: niskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kiskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: niskîsikonâna
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kiskîsikonawa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kiskîsikowâwa
     
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: oskîsikwa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: oskîsikowâwa
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: oskîsikoyiwa

     miskîsik+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: miskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: niskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kiskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: niskîsikonâhk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kiskîsikonâhk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kiskîsikowâhk

     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: oskîsikohk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: oskîsikowâhk
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: oskîsikoyihk

     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [miskîsikos,     miskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [niskîsikos,     niskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kiskîsikos,     kiskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [niskîsikosinân, niskîsikosisinân]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kiskîsikosinaw, kiskîsikosisinaw]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kiskîsikosiwâw, kiskîsikosisiwâw]

     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [oskîsikos,     oskîsikosis]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [oskîsikosiwâw, oskîsikosisiwâw]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [oskîsikosiyiw, oskîsikosisiyiw]

     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [miskîsikosa,     miskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [niskîsikosa,     niskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kiskîsikosa,     kiskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [niskîsikosinâna, niskîsikosisinâna]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kiskîsikosinawa, kiskîsikosisinawa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kiskîsikosiwâwa, kiskîsikosisiwâwa]
     
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [oskîsikosa,      oskîsikosisa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [oskîsikosiwâwa,  oskîsikosisiwâwa]
     miskîsik+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [oskîsikosiyiwa,  oskîsikosisiyiwa]
